New York, session 2025-2026, S7761.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative findings. On July 16, 2024, a high-end EF2 2 tornado struck Rome, New York, causing significant damage across the 3 city. The tornado touched down near the Erie Canal at 3:25 PM and 4 remained on the ground for approximately 10 minutes, covering a path of 5 5.25 miles with a width of 300 yards. Peak winds were estimated at 135 6 mph. Notable damage included the destruction of two church steeples and 7 roofs, numerous uprooted trees, and a decommissioned B-52 bomber at 8 Griffiss International Airport being shifted from its platform. This 9 event was part of a broader severe weather pattern in New York during 10 2024. Warmer temperatures can lead to more moisture in the atmosphere, 11 fueling severe storms and increasing the likelihood of events like 12 tornadoes and heavy precipitation. These conditions underscore the ongo- 13 ing need for preparedness in the face of increasingly volatile weather 14 patterns. 15 § 2. This act enacts into law components of legislation relating to 16 disaster relief for extreme weather events in Central New York, long- 17 term climate resilience property improvements, and insurance discounts 18 for climate mitigation efforts. Each component is wholly contained with- 19 in a Part identified as Parts A through C. The effective date for each 20 particular provision contained within such Part is set forth in the last 21 section of such Part. Any provision in any section contained within a 22 Part, including the effective date of the Part, which makes reference to 23 a section "of this act", when used in connection with that particular EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11866-02-5 S. 7761 2 1 component, shall be deemed to mean and refer to the corresponding 2 section of the Part in which it is found. Section four of this act sets 3 forth the general effective date of this act. 4 PART A 5 Section 1. Central New York extreme weather relief and resiliency 6 grant program. 1. There is hereby established the central New York 7 extreme weather relief and resiliency grant program to provide grants to 8 certain persons and entities that suffered damage from covered events. 9 2. For the purposes of this section, the term "covered event" includes 10 tornadoes that occurred on July 16, 2024 and extreme winter weather 11 events which brought heavy winds, ice, and/or snow that occurred between 12 January 6, 2025 and February 25, 2025, in Oneida, Madison, Herkimer, 13 Onondaga, Otsego, and adjacent counties. 14 3. (a) Small businesses, farms, owners of multiple dwellings, homeown- 15 ers' associations, and not-for-profit organizations that sustained 16 direct physical damage as a result of a covered extreme weather event 17 are eligible to apply for a grant under this program to be used for 18 storm-related repairs and restoration to structures, equipment, and 19 other storm-related costs which are not covered by any other federal, 20 state or local recovery program or third-party payors. 21 (b) Such grant shall be in an amount of no more than $30,000 for 22 owners of multiple dwellings and no more than $100,000 for small busi- 23 nesses, farms, homeowners' associations and not-for-profit corporations; 24 provided, however, that the aggregate amount of all grants distributed 25 under the grant program shall not exceed $25,000,000. 26 (c) The empire state development corporation shall administer the 27 grant program. Such corporation is hereby empowered to establish grant 28 guidelines and additional eligibility criteria, based on available 29 extreme weather damage data provided by applicable state and/or federal 30 agencies, as it deems necessary to effectuate the administration of this 31 program. In administering such grant program, the empire state develop- 32 ment corporation shall give preference to applicants that demonstrate 33 the greatest need. 34 4. (a) Owners of residences that sustained direct physical damage as a 35 result of covered extreme weather events are eligible to apply for a 36 grant under this subdivision. 37 (b) Such grant shall be in an amount of no more than $60,000 and shall 38 be used for storm-related repairs and restoration to structures, equip- 39 ment, and for other storm-related costs, all of which were not covered 40 by any other federal, state or local recovery program or any third-party 41 payors; provided, however, that the aggregate amount of all grants 42 distributed under the grant program shall not exceed $15,000,000. 43 (c) The empire state development corporation shall administer this 44 grant program. Such corporation is hereby empowered to establish grant 45 guidelines and additional eligibility criteria, based on available 46 extreme weather damage data provided by applicable state and/or federal 47 agencies, as it deems necessary to effectuate the administration of this 48 program. In administering such grant program, the empire state develop- 49 ment corporation shall give preference to applicants demonstrating the 50 greatest need. 51 5. (a) Counties, cities, towns, villages, and special districts that 52 sustained direct physical damage as a result of covered extreme weather 53 events are eligible to apply for a grant under this subdivision. S. 7761 3 1 (b) Such grant shall be in an amount of no more than $1,000,000 and 2 shall be used for storm-related repairs and restoration to municipal 3 infrastructure and systems and for snow and tornado-related climate 4 resiliency improvements. Eligible projects may include road and bridge 5 hardening against wind and ice, backup energy generation, snow load 6 mitigation for public buildings, culvert and drainage system improve- 7 ments, emergency response infrastructure upgrades, and similar improve- 8 ments; provided, however, that the aggregate amount of all grants 9 distributed under the grant program shall not exceed $25,000,000. 10 (c) The empire state development corporation shall administer this 11 grant program. Such corporation is hereby empowered to establish grant 12 guidelines and additional eligibility criteria, based on available 13 extreme weather damage data provided by applicable state and/or federal 14 agencies, as it deems necessary to effectuate the administration of this 15 program. In administering such grant program, the empire state develop- 16 ment corporation shall give preference to applicants demonstrating the 17 greatest need. 18 6. (a) Municipalities and special districts that sustained direct 19 physical damage from extreme weather events between January 1, 2024, and 20 March 31, 2025, are eligible to apply for additional grants under this 21 subdivision. 22 (b) Such grants shall not exceed $1,000,000 per applicant. 23 (c) Grants shall be used for repairs and resilience upgrades to public 24 infrastructure and systems affected by snow and tornado-related climate 25 events, including but not limited to road and bridge reinforcements, 26 improved drainage and de-icing infrastructure, backup power systems, and 27 public shelter facilities. 28 (d) All grants must be used for storm-related costs not otherwise 29 covered by any federal, state or local recovery program or third-party 30 payors. 31 (e) The empire state development corporation shall administer this 32 program, which shall not exceed $10,000,000 in the aggregate. 33 § 2. Municipalities participating in the central New York extreme 34 weather relief and resiliency grant program may issue bonds and notes 35 pursuant to subdivision 33-d of paragraph a of section 11.00 of the 36 local finance law to finance grants, infrastructure recovery, and miti- 37 gation authorized pursuant to this act. 38 § 3. The empire state development corporation is authorized to reallo- 39 cate any funds remaining from other programs or unallocated to carry out 40 the purposes of this act. 41 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately and shall be deemed to 42 have been in full force and effect on and after January 1, 2024. 43 PART B 44 Section 1. Expanded resilient and ready program. 1. There is hereby 45 established the expanded resilient and ready program, which shall 46 include the expanded rapid response home repair program and the expanded 47 resilient retrofits program, to provide grants to homeowners impacted by 48 extreme weather events and to provide long-term climate resilience 49 improvements for snow and tornado-related weather hazards. Such program 50 shall be an expansion of the New York state homes and community renewal 51 resilient retrofit program and shall be administered in the same manner 52 as such program is administered. S. 7761 4 1 2. For the purposes of this section, the term "extreme weather events" 2 includes, but is not limited to, tornadoes and winter weather events 3 which bring heavy winds, ice, and/or snow. 4 3. (a) The New York state homes and community renewal rapid response 5 home repair program shall be expanded to provide immediate assistance in 6 the form of grants to homeowners impacted by extreme weather events, as 7 such term is defined in this section. 8 (b) Such grants shall be in an amount of no more than $25,000 per 9 household and shall be used for emergency structural repairs, including 10 but not limited to roofing, electrical, and heating systems. 11 (c) The expanded rapid response home repair program shall be adminis- 12 tered by the division of housing and community renewal, in partnership 13 with local governments and emergency management offices, in the same 14 manner as the rapid response home repair program is administered; 15 provided, however, that local administrators shall be pre-authorized to 16 deploy funds within 30 days of a disaster declaration to ensure timely 17 response. 18 4. (a) The New York state homes and community renewal resilient retro- 19 fits program shall be expanded to support long-term climate resilience 20 improvements for snow and tornado-related weather hazards. 21 (b) Grants provided by the expanded program shall support climate 22 resilience improvements, including but not limited to: tornado-resistant 23 roofing systems, reinforced foundations, snow load-rated roof reinforce- 24 ments, enhanced insulation, ice dam prevention systems, impact-resistant 25 windows, storm shutters, and residential storm shelters. 26 (c) The expanded resilient retrofits program shall be administered in 27 the same manner as the New York state homes and community renewal resil- 28 ient retrofits program is administered. In administering such expanded 29 program, preference shall be given to low- and moderate-income homeown- 30 ers. 31 (d) Participation in the expanded rapid response home repair program 32 may make applicants eligible for property/casualty insurance premium 33 reductions based on risk mitigation. 34 5. Funds in the amount of $50,000,000, or so much thereof as may be 35 available, shall be allocated to the expanded resilient and ready 36 program to support expansion of the New York state homes and community 37 renewal rapid response home repair program and the New York state homes 38 and community renewal resilient retrofits program. 39 § 2. Municipalities participating in the expanded resilient and ready 40 program may issue bonds and notes pursuant to subdivision 33-d of para- 41 graph a of section 11.00 of the local finance law to finance grants, 42 infrastructure recovery, and mitigation authorized pursuant to this act. 43 § 3. The empire state development corporation is authorized to reallo- 44 cate any funds remaining from other programs or unallocated to carry out 45 the purposes of this act. 46 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately and shall be deemed to 47 have been in full force and effect on and after January 1, 2024. 48 PART C 49 Section 1. Central New York property/casualty insurance resiliency 50 incentive program. 1. There is hereby established the central New York 51 property/casualty insurance resiliency incentive program to facilitate 52 property/casualty insurance discounts for mitigation efforts. 53 2. (a) Property/casualty insurers authorized to do business in New 54 York state are encouraged to offer loss mitigation tools and services to S. 7761 5 1 policyholders for free or reduced cost, including smart water monitors, 2 shutoff devices, and electrical fire sensors; provided, however, that 3 the offering of such loss mitigation tools and services for free or 4 reduced cost shall be subject to subsection (a) of section 2324 of the 5 insurance law and shall be offered in compliance with such subsection. 6 (b) Where the market value of such loss mitigation tools and services 7 exceeds $25, the offering of such loss mitigation tools and services 8 shall be specified in the insurance policy and shall have a legitimate 9 nexus to the insurance coverage provided pursuant to subsection (a) of 10 section 1113 and sections 1106 and 1610 of the insurance law. 11 3. (a) The department of financial services may issue guidance to 12 ensure loss mitigation tools and services offered pursuant to this 13 section are: related to risk reduction, appropriately disclosed, and 14 uniformly provided to like insureds in a fair and nondiscriminatory 15 manner. 16 (b) Insurers shall specify in policy forms what loss mitigation tools 17 and services are being offered, who pays for such tools and services, 18 and any applicable conditions or limits. 19 4. Insurers, the New York Property Insurance Underwriting Association 20 (NYPIUA), and rate service organizations (RSOs) shall file with the 21 department of financial services actuarially appropriate discounts for: 22 (a) Installation of devices or systems that mitigate or prevent loss- 23 es, including snow load alarms, ice dam prevention systems, and torna- 24 do-resistant features; and 25 (b) Retrofitting property with storm-resistant roofing systems, 26 impact-resistant windows, storm shutters, or reinforced structural 27 elements specific to snow or tornado events, pursuant to sections 2346 28 and 2346-a of the insurance law and 11 NYCRR § 160.6. 29 5. The department of financial services shall monitor compliance and 30 may adopt rules and regulations to ensure consistent application of this 31 section. 32 § 2. Municipalities participating in the central New York extreme 33 weather relief and resiliency grant program may issue bonds and notes 34 pursuant to subdivision 33-d of paragraph a of section 11.00 of the 35 local finance law to finance grants, infrastructure recovery, and miti- 36 gation authorized pursuant to this act. 37 § 3. The empire state development corporation is authorized to reallo- 38 cate any funds remaining from other programs or unallocated to carry out 39 the purposes of this act. 40 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately and shall be deemed to 41 have been in full force and effect on and after January 1, 2024. 42 § 3. Severability clause. If any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivi- 43 sion, section or part of this act shall be adjudged by any court of 44 competent jurisdiction to be invalid, such judgment shall not affect, 45 impair, or invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in 46 its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, section 47 or part thereof directly involved in the controversy in which such judg- 48 ment shall have been rendered. It is hereby declared to be the intent of 49 the legislature that this act would have been enacted even if such 50 invalid provisions had not been included herein. 51 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately provided, however, that 52 the applicable effective date of Parts A through C of this act shall be 53 as specifically set forth in the last section of such Parts.